Wisconsin, session 2025, SB872.
do enact as follows:SB872,11Section 1. 66.0443 of the statutes is created to read:SB872,2,3266.0443 Racing facilities. (1) In this section, “racing facility” has the 3meaning given in s. 823.086 (1).SB872,2,54(2) No political subdivision may regulate the operation of a racing facility in a 5manner that is inconsistent with s. 823.086.SB872,26Section 2. 823.086 of the statutes is created to read:SB872,2,107823.086 Actions against racing facilities. (1) In this section, “racing 8facility” means a racetrack, regardless of whether the racetrack is permanent or 9seasonal, and includes any spectator areas, garages, and associated grounds, 10buildings, or appurtenances used to conduct competitive motorsports races.SB872,2,1211(2) No racing facility may be found to be a public nuisance if all of the 12following apply:SB872,2,1513(a) The action alleging that the racing facility is a public nuisance is 14commenced by a person that owns real property that is within a 5-mile radius of the 15perimeter of the property on which the racing facility is located.SB872,2,1816(b) The racing facility was constructed or in operation before the person 17commencing the action purchased, or made improvements to, the real property 18described under par. (a).SB872,3,61(3) The prohibition under sub. (2) applies to a racing facility regardless of 2changes to the size of the racing facility or to the scope, configuration, technology, or 3type of racing conducted at the racing facility made after the person commencing 4the action purchased, or made improvements to, the real property described under 5par. (a) if the changes made to the racing facility were not made in violation of any 6legal restriction.SB872,37Section 3. Initial applicability.SB872,3,98(1) The treatment of s. 823.086 first applies to actions commenced on the 9effective date of this subsection.SB872,3,1010